Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 16.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2716
Foreclosure consultant; prohibited acts.

A foreclosure consultant shall not:

(1) Claim, demand, charge, collect, or receive any compensation until after the foreclosure consultant has fully performed each and every service the foreclosure consultant contracted to perform or represented that the foreclosure consultant would perform;

(2) Claim, demand, charge, collect, or receive any interest or any other compensation for a loan that the foreclosure consultant makes to the homeowner that exceeds the prime rate published by the Federal Reserve Board at the time of any loan plus two percentage points, with the total interest rate not to exceed eight percent per year;

(3) Take a wage assignment, a lien of any type on real or personal property, or any other security to secure the payment of compensation;

(4) Receive any consideration from a third party in connection with foreclosure consulting services provided to a homeowner unless the consideration is first fully disclosed in writing to the homeowner;

(5) Acquire an interest, directly, indirectly, or through an associate, in the real or personal property of a homeowner with whom the foreclosure consultant has contracted;

(6) Obtain a power of attorney from a homeowner for any purpose other than to inspect documents as provided by law; or

(7) Induce or attempt to induce a homeowner to enter into a foreclosure consulting contract that does not comply in all respects with sections 76-2713 to 76-2718.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 16.